src/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON NUMERAL_CLASSIFICATORY_MEDIALS
!you can follow these with VAI -izi, -VII -od (ad?)
+aatik+Num:waatig    # "stick";
+ek+Num:weg    # "cloth";
+aabik+Num:waabik    # "metal/glass";
+aabiik+Num:waabiig    # "string/row";
+aak+Num:waak    # "pole";
+ooshkin+Num:ooshkin    # "bag";
+bboon+Num:%>biboon    # "winter";
+bii'gan+Num:%>biihigan    # "card";
+dbahaabaan+Num:%>d2ibahaabaan    # "mile"; !ngod loses its d from the looks of it before d here
+dbik+Num:%>d2ibik    # "night"; !ngod loses its d from the looks of it before d here
+gamik+Num:%>gamig    # "building";
+gon+Num:%>gon    # "day";
+kiins+Num:akiins    # "acre";
+naagaans+Num:%>naagaans    # "cup";
+nik+Num:%>nik    # "arm";
+ninj+Num:%>ninj    # "hand";
+waakwagan+Num:%>waakBv1wagan    # "hand";
+oode+Num:oode    # "family";
+oonak+Num:oonag    # "boat";
+sak+Num:%>sag    # "barrel";
+wewaan+Num:wewaan    # "group";
+zit+Num:%>zid    # "foot";
+na+Num:%>na    CLOSED_PROTECTION "loaf";

LEXICON NUMERAL_FINALS
!nen'godooshkne ->neningod-ooshkin-e be a max of one to each... a distributive reduplicated form (NOT bebezhig!) plus -ooshkine. there are similar ones
+oon'gat+VII:oonagad2 VII_ORDERS_GET "be N boat loads"; !Lumping classifier material with final. oonag classifier exists, but I'm a bit leery of -ad2 as a final on its own.
+oon'gizi+VAI:oonagizi VAI_ORDERS_GET "be N boat loads"; 
+doopwin'gat+VII:%>d2oopowinigad2   VII_ORDERS_GET "be N tablefuls" ; !doopwin is clear, but then you have -igad2 in addition to -ad2 ... need to delete dd>d with ngod
+doopwin'gizi+VAI:%>d2oopowinagizi   VAI_ORDERS_GET "be N tablefuls" ; !doopwin is clear, but then you have -igad2 in addition to -ad2
+ooshkne+VII:ooshkine       VII_ORDERS_GET "be N containerfuls" ; 
+ooshkne+VAI:ooshkine       VAI_ORDERS_GET "be N containerfuls" ; 
+gnagat+VII:%>gonagad2      VII_ORDERS_GET "be N days later" ; !gon 'day' + gad? 'absent'
+gnendi+VAI:%>gonendi       VAI_ORDERS_GET "be absent for N days" ; !gon 'day' + endi 'absent'
+gnagzi+VAI:%>gonagizi      VAI_ORDERS_GET "be N days" ; !gon 'day' + agizi 'be'
+bboon'gizi+VAI:%>biboonagizi      VAI_ORDERS_GET "be N years" ; !biboon 'winter' + -agizi 'be'
+gaade+VAI:%>gaade            VAI_ORDERS_GET "have N legs" ; !biboon 'winter' + -agizi 'be'
!niizhoobhidwag niizh=2, bahidi=run oo=??
!niizhooshin niizh=2, shin=lie oo=??
+waabgonii+VII:waabagonii    VII_ORDERS_GET "grow N" ; 
+wewaan'gizi+VAI:wewaanagizi    VAI_ORDERS_GET "be N groups" ; 
